Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,151
Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund; transfers authorized; Construction Administration Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)(a) The Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund is hereby created. The fund shall be held as a trust fund for the purposes and uses described in the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Assistance Act.

(b) The fund shall consist of federal capitalization grants, state matching appropriations, repayments of principal and interest on loans, transfers made pursuant to section 71-5327, and other money designated for the fund. The director may make loans from the fund pursuant to the act and may use (i) up to four percent of all federal capitalization grant awards to the fund, (ii) up to four hundred thousand dollars per year, or (iii) the equivalent of one-fifth percent per year of the current valuation of the fund for the reasonable cost of administering the fund and conducting activities under Title VI of the federal Clean Water Act.

(c) The state investment officer shall invest any money in the fund available for investment pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, except that (i) amounts designated by the director for use in the linked deposit program shall be deposited with eligible financial institutions by the director and (ii) any bond proceeds in the fund shall be invested in accordance with the terms of the documents under which the bonds are issued. The state investment officer may direct that the bond proceeds shall be deposited with the bond trustee for investment. Investment earnings shall be credited to the fund.

(d) The department may create or direct the creation of accounts within the fund as the department determines to be appropriate and useful in administering the fund and in providing for the security, investment, and repayment of bonds.

(e) The fund and the assets thereof may be used, to the extent permitted by the Clean Water Act, as amended, and the regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act, (i) to pay or to secure the payment of bonds and the interest thereon, except that amounts deposited into the fund from state appropriations and the earnings on such appropriations may not be used to pay or to secure the payment of bonds or the interest thereon, (ii) to deposit as provided by the linked deposit program, and (iii) to buy or refinance the debt obligation of municipalities for wastewater treatment works if the debt was incurred and construction was begun after March 7, 1985. Eligibility and terms of such refinancing shall be in accordance with the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Assistance Act.

(f) The director may transfer any money in the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund to the Drinking Water Facilities Loan Fund to meet the purposes of section 71-5327. The director shall identify any such transfer in the intended use plan presented to the council for annual review and adoption pursuant to section 71-5321.

(2)(a) There is hereby created the Construction Administration Fund. Any funds available for administering loans or fees collected pursuant to the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Assistance Act shall be deposited in such fund. The fund shall be administered by the department for the purposes of the act. The state investment officer shall invest any money in the fund available for investment pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings shall be credited to the fund.

(b) The Construction Administration Fund and assets thereof may be used, to the extent permitted by the Clean Water Act and the regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act, to fund subdivisions (11), (12), and (13) of section 81-15,153. The annual obligation of the state pursuant to subdivisions (11) and (13) of such section shall not exceed sixty-five percent of the revenue from administrative fees collected pursuant to this section in the prior fiscal year.

(c) The director may transfer any money in the Construction Administration Fund to the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund to meet the nonfederal match requirements of any applicable federal capitalization grants or to meet the purposes of subdivision (11) of section 81-15,153.

Laws 1988, LB 766, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 623, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 311, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 68;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 121;

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 24;

Laws 2008, LB726, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB514, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB737, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB307, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.